Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 635 Public Offenders

635.010.
Complaint — Duties of county attorney and court-designated worker.

The county attorney shall cause a review to be made of each complaint alleging that a public offense has been committed. The purpose of this review shall be to determine from the available evidence whether there are reasonable grounds to believe that the alleged facts would constitute a public offense. The county attorney may elect not to proceed with the complaint, regardless of whether reasonable grounds exist, and dismiss the complaint.

The county attorney, upon receipt of a request for special review, shall consider the facts presented by the complainant and by the court-designated worker who made the recommendation that no petition be filed, before the county attorney makes a final decision as to whether a public offense petition shall or shall not be filed.

In all cases in which the child is alleged to have committed a public offense and is not detained, the court-designated worker shall submit his written recommendation to the county attorney or designee within twenty (20) days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, from the date the child was taken into custody or the complaint was filed. In cases where the child is detained, the court-designated worker’s report shall be submitted within seventy-two (72) hours of the time the child is ordered detained.

The county attorney may not file a petition if the complaint is a misdemeanor and the child who is the subject of the diversion agreement has no prior adjudications and no prior diversions.

If a public offense petition is filed, it shall be verified by information and belief and contain the information listed in KRS

610.020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 124, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 94, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 39, effective July 15, 1997; 2014, ch. 132, § 45, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(1), the amendment of this statute by Section 39 of that Act becomes effective July 15, 1997.

Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 199 read: “KRS

446.250

to

446.320

to the contrary notwithstanding, Acts 1986, ch. 423 shall prevail in the event of a conflict between Acts 1986, ch. 423 and other Acts passed by the 1986 regular session of the General Assembly.”

635.020.
Criteria for determining how child is to be tried.

If, prior to an adjudicatory hearing, there is a reasonable cause to believe that a child before the court has committed a felony other than those described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a misdemeanor, or a violation, the court shall initially proceed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

If a child charged with a capital offense, Class A felony, or Class B felony, had attained age fourteen (14) at the time of the alleged commission of the offense, the court shall, upon motion of the county attorney made prior to adjudication, and after the county attorney has consulted with the Commonwealth’s attorney, that the child be proceeded against as a youthful offender, proceed in accordance with the provisions of KRS

640.010

.

If a child charged with a Class C or Class D felony has on one (1) prior separate occasion been adjudicated a public offender for a felony offense and had attained the age of sixteen (16) at the time of the alleged commission of the offense, the court shall, upon motion of the county attorney made prior to adjudication, and after the county attorney has consulted with the Commonwealth’s attorney, that the child be proceeded against as a youthful offender, proceed in accordance with the provisions of KRS

640.010

.

If a child charged with a felony in which a firearm, whether functional or not, was used by the child in the commission of the offense had attained the age of fourteen (14) years at the time of the commission of the alleged offense, the court shall, upon motion of the county attorney made prior to adjudication, and after the county attorney has consulted with the Commonwealth’s attorney, that the child be proceeded against as a youthful offender, proceed in accordance with KRS

640.010

.

If a child previously convicted as a youthful offender under the provisions of KRS Chapter 640 is charged with a felony allegedly committed prior to his eighteenth birthday, the court shall, upon motion of the county attorney made prior to adjudication, and after the county attorney has consulted with the Commonwealth’s attorney, that the child be proceeded against as a youthful offender, proceed in accordance with the provisions of KRS

640.010

.

A child who is charged as is provided in subsection (2) of this section and is also charged with a Class C or D felony, a misdemeanor, or a violation arising from the same course of conduct shall have all charges included in the same proceedings; and the court shall, upon motion of the county attorney made prior to adjudication, and after the county attorney has consulted with the Commonwealth’s attorney, that the child be proceeded against as a youthful offender, proceed in accordance with the provisions of KRS

640.010

.

If a person who is eighteen (18) or older and before the court is charged with a felony that occurred prior to his eighteenth birthday, the court shall, upon motion of the county attorney made prior to adjudication, and after the county attorney has consulted with the Commonwealth’s attorney, that the child be proceeded against as a youthful offender, proceed in accordance with the provisions of KRS

640.010

.

All offenses arising out of the same course of conduct shall be tried with the felony arising from that course of conduct, whether the charges are adjudicated under this chapter or under KRS Chapter 640 and transferred to Circuit Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 125, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 95, effective April 10, 1988; 1994, ch. 396, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 40, effective July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 538, § 17, effective April 13, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 85, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 534, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 257, § 15, effective July 15, 2002; 2021 ch. 132, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

635.025.
Transfer of a youth to an adult facility by sentencing Circuit Court — Hearing.

Upon motion of the Department of Juvenile Justice, the sentencing Circuit Court may, after notice and hearing, order a youth, transferred under KRS 635.020(4), committed to an adult facility operated by the Department of Corrections if it is established by a preponderance of the evidence that the juvenile:

By his or her violent behavior, injured or endangered the life or health of another youthful offender or staff members in the facility or program;

Escaped from the facility or program from which the juvenile is being held;

By his or her actions, caused disruption in the facility or program by encouraging other residents to engage in violent behavior which has injured or endangered the life or health of other residents or staff of the facility or program;

By his or her actions, caused disruption in the facility or program, smuggled contraband into the facility or program, caused contraband to be smuggled into the facility or program, or engaged in other types of behavior which have endangered the life or health of other residents or staff of the facility or program; or

By his or her actions has established a pattern of disruptive behavior not conducive to the established policies and procedures of the program.

The hearing described in subsection (1) of this section shall be held in the sentencing Circuit Court within ten (10) days of the filing of the motion provided for in subsection (1) of this section.

Upon a youth’s admission to a facility or program operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice, the department shall advise that youth of the provisions of this section.

Upon motion of the Department of Juvenile Justice, the sentencing Circuit Court may, after notice and hearing, order a youth committed to the Department of Corrections, if the Department of Juvenile Justice establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that the youth is mentally ill, dangerous to himself or others, and cannot be adequately treated in the program. The court shall presume that a youth is mentally ill if the youth has pled guilty to, or has been convicted of, a felony and has been found by the court or jury to be guilty but mentally ill.

Any youth remanded to the Department of Corrections under any provision of this chapter shall not later be placed in a facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 538, § 18, effective April 13, 1998; 2000, ch. 534, § 12, effective July 14, 2000.

635.030.
Dismissal of proceedings. [Repealed.]

635.040.
Effect of adjudication by juvenile court.

No adjudication by a juvenile session of District Court shall be deemed a conviction, nor shall such adjudication operate to impose any of the civil disabilities ordinarily resulting from a criminal conviction, nor shall any child be found guilty or be deemed a criminal by reason of such adjudication.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 127, effective July 1, 1987.

635.050.
Detention of child after adjudication.

After adjudication, a determination by the court that a child shall be detained pending disposition shall be based on a finding of the court by a preponderance of the evidence that the circumstances surrounding the child are such as to endanger his safety or welfare or that of the community.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 128, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 96, effective April 10, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.24.

635.055.
Detention of child found in contempt of court.

No child who is found to be in contempt of court shall be committed as a public offender as a result of such finding, nor detained because of such finding in a facility other than a secure juvenile detention facility, youth alternative center, an alternative to detention program approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice, or a nonsecure detention alternative. An order of detention for a child found in contempt shall not exceed thirty (30) days.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 97, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 538, § 10, effective April 13, 1998; 2000, ch. 193, § 15, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 534, § 13, effective July 14, 2000; 2014, ch. 132, § 46, effective July 1, 2015.

635.060.
Options of court at dispositional hearing.

If in its decree the juvenile court finds that the child comes within the purview of this chapter, the court, at the dispositional hearing, may impose any combination of the following, except that the court shall, if a validated risk and needs assessment tool is available, consider the validated risk and needs assessment submitted to the court and parties by the Department of Juvenile Justice or other agency before imposing any disposition:

Order the child or his parents, guardian, or person exercising custodial control to make restitution or reparation to any injured person to the extent, in the sum and upon the conditions as the court determines. However, no parent, guardian, or person exercising custodial control shall be ordered to make restitution or reparation unless the court has provided notice of the hearing, provided opportunity to be heard, and made a finding that the person’s failure to exercise reasonable control or supervision was a substantial factor in the child’s delinquency;

Place the child:

Under parental supervision in the child’s own home or in a suitable home or boarding home, upon the conditions that the court shall determine, or

On probation under conditions that the court shall determine.

At the time the child is placed on probation, the court shall explain to the child the sanctions which may be imposed if the court’s conditions are violated, and shall include notice of those sanctions as part of its written order of probation. A child placed on probation shall be subject to the visitation and supervision of a probation officer or an employee of the Department of Juvenile Justice.

The conditions of probation shall include authorization for the use of graduated sanctions prior to a court review for the imposition of a term of detention. If the court has previously imposed graduated sanctions for a violation of conditions of supervision by a child monitored by the court, or makes a finding that the graduated sanctions have previously been imposed for a child on probation, then the court may impose a sanction of up to thirty (30) days’ detention for a violation of the conditions of supervision or probation. A court may not impose detention prior to use of graduated sanctions unless there is clear and convincing evidence that there are no graduated sanctions available that are appropriate for the child and the child is an immediate threat to himself or others. Except where commitment has been probated pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, a child may not be committed or recommitted to the Department of Juvenile Justice for a violation of a condition of probation.

A child placed on probation or supervision with court monitoring shall remain subject to the jurisdiction of the court as follows, except that if a person is placed on probation after the person reaches the age of seventeen (17) years and six (6) months, the probation shall be for a period not to exceed one (1) year:

If the child was adjudicated for an offense that would be a violation if committed by an adult, the period of probation or supervision shall not exceed thirty (30) days, except that the court may order up to three (3) months of supervision if the court-ordered treatment includes a program that requires longer than thirty (30) days to complete;

If the child was adjudicated for an offense that would be a misdemeanor if committed by an adult, other than an offense for which a child has been declared a juvenile sex offender under KRS

635.510

or an offense involving a deadly weapon, the period of probation or supervision shall not exceed six (6) months, except that the court may order up to twelve (12) months of supervision if the court-ordered substance abuse or mental health treatment includes a program that requires longer than six (6) months to complete;

If the child was adjudicated for an offense that would be a Class D felony if committed by an adult, other than an offense for which a child has been declared a juvenile sex offender under KRS

635.510

or an offense involving a deadly weapon, the period of probation or supervision shall not exceed twelve (12) months; or

If the child was adjudicated for an offense that would be a felony offense if committed by an adult, other than a Class D felony offense, or for an offense involving a deadly weapon, or for an offense in which the child has not been declared a sexual offender pursuant to KRS 635.510, the child may be placed on probation up to age eighteen (18);

If the child was adjudicated for an offense other than an offense that would be a violation if committed by an adult, order the child confined in an approved secure detention facility or detention program, as authorized by KRS Chapter 15A, as follows:

If the child is fourteen (14) years of age but less than sixteen (16) years of age, the child may be confined for a period of time not to exceed forty-five (45) days; or

If the child is sixteen (16) years of age or older, the child may be confined for a period of time not to exceed ninety (90) days.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall pay for the confinement of children confined pursuant to this subsection in accordance with the statewide detention plan and administrative regulations implementing the plan;

Order the child to be committed or recommitted to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice, grant guardianship to a child-caring facility or a child-placing agency authorized to care for the child, or place the child under the custody and supervision of a suitable person if:

The child was adjudicated for an offense that would be a misdemeanor or Class D felony if committed by an adult and the child has at least three (3) prior adjudications, excluding prior adjudications of offenses designated as a violation, or at least four (4) prior adjudications of violations, which do not arise from the same course of conduct; or

The child was adjudicated for an offense involving a deadly weapon, an offense in which the child has been declared a juvenile sexual offender under KRS

635.510

, or an offense that would be a felony offense if committed by an adult, other than a Class D felony .

The commitment shall be for the following term, subject to KRS

635.070

and the power of the court to terminate the order and discharge the child prior thereto:

If the child was adjudicated for an offense that would be a misdemeanor if committed by an adult, other than an offense for which a child has been declared a juvenile sex offender under KRS

635.510

or an offense involving a deadly weapon, the child may be committed for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months, including all time spent in the treatment plan established pursuant to KRS

15A.0652

;

If the child was adjudicated for an offense that would be a Class D felony if committed by an adult, other than an offense for which a child has been declared a juvenile sex offender under KRS 635.510 or an offense involving a deadly weapon, the child may be committed for a period not to exceed eighteen (18) months, including all time spent in the treatment plan established pursuant to KRS

15A.0652

;

If the child was adjudicated for an offense that would be a felony offense if committed by an adult, other than a Class D felony offense, or an offense involving a deadly weapon, the child may be committed up to age eighteen (18);

If the child was adjudicated for an offense that results in the child being declared a juvenile sexual offender, the commitment shall be as provided in KRS

635.515

;

The court, in its discretion, upon motion by the child and with the concurrence of the Department of Juvenile Justice, may authorize an extension of commitment up to age twenty-one (21) to permit the Department of Juvenile Justice to assist the child in establishing independent living arrangements; and

If a child is committed after the child reaches the age of seventeen (17) years and six (6) months, and except as provided in subparagraph 4. of this paragraph, the commitment shall be for a period not to exceed one (1) year.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall:

Accept physical custody of a child who is detained in an approved secure juvenile detention facility in accordance with KRS

15A.200

to

15A.240

at the time the child is committed or recommitted to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall remove the child from the approved secure juvenile detention facility and secure appropriate placement as soon as possible but not to exceed thirty-five (35) days of the time of commitment or recommitment; and

Pay for the cost of detention from the date of commitment or recommitment, on the current charge, until the child is removed from the detention facility and placed.

All orders of commitment may include advisory recommendations the court may deem proper in the best interests of the child and of the public; or

The court may probate or suspend a commitment ordered pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, except that if a court probates or suspends a commitment in conjunction with any other dispositional alternative, that fact shall be explained to the juvenile and contained in a written order.

Any probation or suspension imposed shall not exceed the time limitations established under subsection (2) of this section.

If the child successfully completes the conditions of probation, the court shall terminate the case.

The court may, for violations of the conditions of probation, revoke the probation or suspension ordered under this section and order the child committed.

The period of the commitment shall not exceed the terms established under subsection (4) of this section.

Any time a child has spent in out-of-home placement as a result of a violation of a condition of probation or suspension under this section shall be credited toward the period of commitment.

If a commitment is probated or suspended after a child reaches the age of seventeen (17) years and six (6) months, the period of the suspension, and commitment if revoked, shall be for a period not to exceed one (1) year, but not to exceed age nineteen (19).

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 129, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 98, effective April 10, 1988; 1994, ch. 226, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 489, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 41, effective in part July 1, 1997, and in part July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 606, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 257, § 16, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 160, § 5, effective July 13, 2004; 2014, ch. 132, § 47, effective July 1, 2015.

635.070.
Discharge from commitment or guardianship.

The Department of Juvenile Justice may discharge the child from commitment after providing fourteen (14) days’ prior written notice to the committing court, to the legal representative of the child, and to the county attorney of the county in which the committing court presides, which may object to the discharge by holding a court review under KRS

610.120

. During the period of commitment or placement, the court may review a dispositional order and may continue or terminate such order as the court deems essential to the best interests of the child.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 130, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 99, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 43, effective July 1, 1997; 2000, ch. 534, § 14, effective July 14, 2000.

635.080.
Jurisdiction for second offenses — Work program orders.

If a child who has not reached his eighteenth birthday commits a new offense while under the jurisdiction of the court or during the period of commitment, the court of the county where the new offense is committed shall have jurisdiction of the new offense for purposes of adjudication but may transfer the case for disposition to the court having jurisdiction of the prior offense.

If a child has been adjudicated a status or public offender, the court in its discretion may order participation in a community services work program. If the child is committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice on a previous offense, the child shall not be released from commitment if ordered to a work program until the completion of his commitment. The work program shall be of a constructive nature designed to promote the rehabilitation of the child. The program shall be appropriate to the age level and physical ability of the child and shall be combined with counseling and supervision from a probation officer or other responsible person. The work program shall not be scheduled during such times that would interfere with educational, occupational, or religious obligations of the child. Assignment to a community services work program shall be made to a governmental or nonprofit community organization for a specified period of time, not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) hours. A child may be directed to participate in a community services work program as provided in this subsection for the purposes of restitution. Participation in community-services-related projects shall not be deemed employment for any purpose, and the child shall not be deemed an employee or agent of the entity for which he performs the community service work.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 131, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 100, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 44, effective July 15, 1997; 2014, ch. 132, § 48, effective July 1, 2015.

635.083.
Court’s continuing jurisdiction over juvenile repeat offenders.

A juvenile convicted of or adjudged delinquent of three (3) or more offenses, other than violations or status offenses, by the juvenile session of District Court, shall be retained under the jurisdiction and supervision of the court with regard to the commission of that offense until the child reaches the age of eighteen (18), except that if the child is convicted of or adjudged delinquent of a third or subsequent misdemeanor offense after the child reaches the age of seventeen (17) years and six (6) months, the court’s jurisdiction and supervision shall continue for a period not to exceed one (1) year. This jurisdiction shall continue even after the service of incarceration or other court-ordered punishment in the form of conditional discharge. Violation of the terms and conditions of conditional discharge shall be punished as contempt of court.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to adjudications of delinquency for more than one (1) misdemeanor arising from the same incident.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 358, § 42, effective July 15, 1997.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(1), this statute becomes effective July 15, 1997.

(7/15/96). Although 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 42, indicated that it was creating a new section of KRS Chapter 630, this statute has been codified in KRS Chapter 635 because the text of the statute clearly indicates that it does not apply to status offenses. See KRS 7.136(1)(a).

635.085.
Imposition of fines.

In lieu of commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice, if a child is adjudicated a public offender, the court may in its discretion impose a fine. The imposition of a fine for an offense committed by a child shall be based upon a determination that such disposition is in the best interest of the child and to aid in his rehabilitation. Any such order shall include a finding that the child is financially able to pay the fine. Fines shall be levied consistent with the schedule set forth below:

For a felony, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500);

For a misdemeanor, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250); and

For a violation, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

When a child is directed by the court to pay a fine, the court may provide for payment to be made within a specified period of time or in specified installments. If such provision is not made a part of the court’s disposition, the fine shall be payable immediately. Nothing contained herein shall be construed as limiting the court’s inherent contempt powers.

Any public offender detained for failure to comply with the court order shall not be scheduled for a time that would interfere with the educational, occupational, or religious obligations of the child, and shall be in a secure juvenile detention facility or approved detention program authorized by the Department of Juvenile Justice in accordance with KRS Chapter 15A. Any portion of a day a child is detained pursuant to the court’s exercising its contempt powers shall be deemed as one (1) day for purposes of serving a detention term.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(1), the amendment of this statute by Section 45 of that Act becomes effective July 15, 1997.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Juvenile Code Proceedings, § 258.00.

635.090.
Options when child’s case not to be handled under KRS Chapter 640 — Commitment to Department of Juvenile Justice.

If the court chooses to treat the child as other than a youthful offender, if the Commonwealth fails to prove the criteria bringing a case under KRS Chapter 640, or if the county attorney elects not to proceed under KRS Chapter 640, the court may:

If a child is fourteen (14) years of age or older and is adjudicated a public offender in the commission of a capital offense, Class A felony, or Class B felony, the court in its discretion may commit the child to the Department of Juvenile Justice for purposes of treatment or placement in a facility or program for an indeterminate period of time not less than six (6) months. The Department of Juvenile Justice may petition the court to continue the commitment for the purpose of completing a treatment program but the commitment shall not extend past the child’s nineteenth birthday; or

If a child is sixteen (16) years of age or older and is adjudicated a public offender in the commission of a felony offense and has previously been adjudicated delinquent of one (1) or more felony offenses not arising out of the same course of conduct in separate adjudications, or has previously been adjudicated a public offender for one (1) or more felony offenses not arising out of the same course of conduct in separate adjudications, the court in its discretion may commit the child to the Department of Juvenile Justice for purposes of treatment or placement in a facility or program for an indeterminate period of time not less than six (6) months. The Department of Juvenile Justice may petition the court to continue the commitment for the purpose of completing a treatment program, but the commitment shall not extend past the child’s nineteenth birthday.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall maintain jurisdiction over the child during the period of the commitment. The committing court may, upon motion of the Department of Juvenile Justice, order the child released from the facility or program operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall notify the committing court if it transfers the child to a different facility or program and note the reasons for the transfer.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall notify the committing court prior to the termination of treatment or placement as to the future intentions of the Department of Juvenile Justice as they relate to continued treatment of the child.

The committing court may, upon motion of the child, grant shock probation to any child committed under this section after the child has been committed for a minimum of thirty (30) days.

After a child has been committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice as provided in this section, he may not then be transferred to the Circuit Court as provided for in KRS

640.020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 132, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 102, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 46, effective in part July 1, 1997, and in part July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 443, § 22, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.14.

635.095.
Authority to promulgate administrative regulations.

The Department of Juvenile Justice may promulgate administrative regulations to implement provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 443, § 23, effective July 15, 1998.

635.100.
Graduated sanctions protocol for violation of supervised placement terms or conditions — Effect of escape, absence without leave, or violation of conditions of placement — Administrative hearings and regulations.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall develop and implement a graduated sanctions protocol of swift, certain, proportionate, and graduated sanctions that the department shall apply in response to a committed child’s violations of the terms or conditions of supervised placement.

Any child committed to or in the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice who escapes or is absent without leave from his or her placement shall be taken into custody and returned to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice by any juvenile probation officer or by any peace officer on direction of the Department of Juvenile Justice.

A child taken into custody as provided in this subsection shall be returned to the active custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice within three (3) days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, and no administrative hearing shall be required.

Any child committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice who is placed on supervised placement by the Department of Juvenile Justice and who violates the terms or conditions of supervised placement may be returned to active custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice and shall be taken into custody by any juvenile probation officer or by any peace officer on direction of the Department of Juvenile Justice.

A child taken into custody may be held in a Department of Juvenile Justice facility, program, or contract facility, prior to the administrative hearing, provided a preliminary hearing is held by a person designated by the Department of Juvenile Justice within five (5) days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of the holding, unless the child or his representative request or agree to a longer period of time, to determine if there is probable cause to believe that the child violated his supervised placement conditions and, if so, to determine if the best interest of the child requires that the child be held in custody pending an administrative hearing pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. The child and his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision shall be given an opportunity to be heard and to be represented by counsel at the preliminary hearing.

If the child is returned to the active custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice as provided in subsection (4) of this section an administrative hearing shall be held as follows:

The hearing shall be held within ten (10) days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of the preliminary hearing unless the child and his representative request or agree to a longer period of time;

The hearing shall be presided over by one (1) hearing officer designated by the Department of Juvenile Justice to hear such matters at which time the child and his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision shall be given an opportunity to be heard and be represented by counsel; and

The department shall have the power to administer oaths and to issue subpoenas compelling the attendance of witnesses as it may deem necessary to the case of any child before it. Disobedience of a subpoena may be punished as contempt of court, after a hearing before the committing juvenile court.

Administrative hearings conducted under this section and administrative regulations promulgated under this section shall be exempt from the requirements of KRS Chapter 13B.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate administrative regulations to govern at least the following aspects of this section:

Commissioner’s warrant;

Procedural aspects of the hearing;

Burden of proof;

Standard of proof; and

Administrative appeal process.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 133, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 103, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 47, effective July 1, 1997; 1998, ch. 538, § 11, effective April 13, 1998; 2000, ch. 534, § 15, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 263, § 6, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 160, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2014, ch. 132, § 50, effective July 15, 2014.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.16.

635.110.
Human immunodeficiency virus testing for juveniles accused of certain sexual offenses — Results — Counseling when test positive.

A juvenile session of a District Court shall comply with the provisions of KRS

510.320

when a child is accused of commission of a public offense as described therein.

A juvenile session of a District Court shall order a child who is adjudicated a public offender to submit to a human immunodeficiency virus test pursuant to KRS

510.320

if the offense is one described therein.

The result of any human immunodeficiency virus test conducted pursuant to this section shall not be a public record for purposes of KRS Chapter 61.

The result of any human immunodeficiency virus test conducted pursuant to this section shall only be made available by the Department of Juvenile Justice to the victim, the parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor or is an individual with an intellectual disability or mentally incapacitated, the child adjudicated as a public offender and his parents or guardian, the court issuing the order for testing, and as otherwise directed pursuant to KRS Chapter 214.

If the human immunodeficiency virus test indicates the presence of human immunodeficiency virus infection, the Department of Juvenile Justice shall provide counseling to the victim and the juvenile offender regarding human immunodeficiency virus disease and referral for appropriate health care and support services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 389, § 2, effective July 1, 1992; 1996, ch. 358, § 48, effective July 1, 1997; 2012, ch. 146, § 142, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(3), the amendment of this statute by Section 48 of that Act becomes effective July 1, 1997, in that it deals with functions of the Department of Juvenile Justice.

635.120.
Release of records of juvenile tried as an adult.

Records, limited to the records of the present case in which the child has been charged, of juveniles tried as adults in the Circuit Court shall be open to the public after the child has been indicted and arraigned on the offense for trial of the child as an adult.

Records of juveniles tried in the adult session of the District Court shall be open to the public from the time the decision is made by the court to try the child as an adult.

This section shall not be construed as permitting the release of the child’s treatment, medical, mental, or psychological records unless the records are presented as evidence in Circuit Court.

The release of information under this section relative to the child’s eligibility for services under Title IV-E or IV-B of the Federal Social Security Act is prohibited.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 358, § 49, effective July 15, 1996.